California statutes. Financial Code
(a) A licensee shall file an annual report with the commissioner, on or before March 15, that contains all relevant information that the commissioner reasonably requires concerning the business and operations conducted by the licensee in the state during the preceding calendar year, including information regarding collection activity. The report shall, at minimum, require disclosure of all of the following information:

(1) The total number of California debtor accounts purchased or
 collected on in the preceding year.

(2) The total dollar amount of California debtor accounts purchased in the preceding year.

(3) The face value dollar amount of California debtor accounts in the licensee’s portfolio in the preceding year.

(4) The total dollar amount of California debtor accounts collected in the preceding year, and the total dollar amount of outstanding debt that remains uncollected.

(5) The total dollar amount of net proceeds generated by California debtor accounts in the preceding year. 

(6) Whether or not the licensee is acting as a debt collector, debt buyer, or both.

(7) The case number of any action in which the licensee was held liable by final judgment under Title 1.6C (commencing with Section 1788) or Title 1.6C.5 (commencing with Section 1788.50) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code.

(b) The individual annual reports filed pursuant to this section shall be made available to the public for inspection.

(c) The report shall be made under oath and in the form prescribed by the commissioner.

(d) A licensee shall make other special reports that may be required by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 163, Sec. 3.   (SB 908)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Sec. 100000.5.)
-------------------------------------------

100022.

A licensee that ceases to engage in debt collection shall inform the commissioner in writing and surrender the license and all other indicia of license to the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 163, Sec. 3.   (SB 908)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Sec. 100000.5.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Periodic Examination of Licensees  [100023. - 100023.]

100023.

(a) As often as the commissioner deems necessary and appropriate, the commissioner shall examine the affairs of each licensee for compliance with this division. The commissioner shall appoint suitable persons to perform the examination. The commissioner and their appointees may examine the books, records, and documents of the licensee, and may examine the licensee’s officers, directors, employees, or agents under oath regarding the licensee’s debt collection operations.

(b) The commissioner
 may cooperate with any agency of the state, the federal government, or other states in performing license examinations.

(c) This section does not require the commissioner to conduct examinations at the business offices of licensees. Unless an onsite examination is considered necessary for the protection of the public, the commissioner may conduct some or all examinations without a site visit to the business office of a licensee, by requesting that licensees submit required books and records to the department electronically, via a secure portal.

(d) Unless otherwise exempt pursuant to Section 100001, affiliates
 of a licensee are subject to examination by the commissioner on the same terms as the licensee, but only when reports from, or examination of, a licensee provides documented evidence of unlawful activity between a licensee and affiliate benefitting, affecting, or arising from the activities regulated by this division.

(e) The cost of each examination of a licensee shall be paid to the commissioner by the licensee examined, and the commissioner may maintain an action for the recovery of the cost in any court of competent jurisdiction. In determining the cost of the examination, the commissioner may use the estimated average hourly cost for all persons performing examinations of licensees or other persons subject to this division for the fiscal year.

(f) The statement of
 the findings of an examination shall belong to the commissioner and shall not be disclosed to anyone other than the licensee, law enforcement officials, or other state or federal regulatory agencies for further investigation and enforcement. Reports required of licensees by the commissioner under this division and results of examinations performed by the commissioner under this division are the property of the commissioner.

(g) The commissioner shall provide a written statement of the findings of the examination, issue a copy of that statement to the licensee and take appropriate steps to ensure correction of any violations of this division.

(h) Notwithstanding any provision of this division, the commissioner shall have the authority to waive one or more branch office
 examinations, if the commissioner deems that the branch office examinations are not necessary for the protection of the public, due to the centralized operations of the licensee or other factors acceptable to the commissioner.

(i) In any proceeding under this division, the burden of proving an exemption or an exception from a definition is upon the person claiming it.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 163, Sec. 3.   (SB 908)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Sec. 100000.5.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Advisory Committee [100025. - 100025.]

100025.

(a) There is within the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, a Debt Collection Advisory Committee.

(b) The Debt Collection Advisory Committee shall advise the commissioner on matters relating to debt collection or the debt collection business, including proposed fee schedules and the mechanics and feasibility of implementing requirements proposed in regulations.

(c) The Debt Collection Advisory Committee shall consist of seven members; one of whom shall represent consumers.

(1) The members of the Debt Collection Advisory Committee shall be appointed by the commissioner.

(2) The term of a member of the Debt Collection Advisory Committee shall be two years. However, a member may be reappointed.

(3) Membership in the Debt Collection Advisory Committee shall be voluntary. No person shall be required to accept an appointment to the Debt Collection Advisory Committee, and any member may resign at any time by filing a resignation with the commissioner.

(4) No member of the Debt Collection Advisory Committee shall receive any compensation, reimbursement for expenses, or other payment from the state in connection with service on the Debt Collection Advisory Committee.

(d) The Debt Collection Advisory Committee shall meet at least twice each calendar year.

(e) The commissioner may, by order or regulation, prescribe
 rules governing the Debt Collection Advisory Committee and its members, including, but not limited to, matters relating to meetings, quorum, and actions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 166.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 26. FIREARMS MERCHANT CATEGORY CODE [110000. - 110002.]

110000.

For purposes of this division, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Ammunition” has the same meaning as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 16150 of the Penal Code.

(b) “Firearm” has the same meaning as provided in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 16520 of the Penal Code.

(c) “Firearm accessory” means an attachment or device designed or adapted to be inserted into, affixed onto, or used in conjunction with a firearm that is designed, intended, or functions to alter or enhance the firing capabilities of a firearm, the lethality of the firearm, or a
 shooter’s ability to hold and use a firearm.

(d) “Firearms merchant” means a business licensed in California as a firearms dealer or ammunition vendor for which the highest sales value is, or is expected to be, from the combined sale in California of firearms, firearm accessories, or ammunition, as stated by the business to its merchant acquirer in the ordinary course of business.

(e) “Merchant acquirer” means an entity that establishes a relationship with a merchant for the purposes of processing credit, debit, or prepaid transactions.

(f) “Payment card network” means an entity that provides services that route transactions between bank participants to conduct debit, credit, or prepaid
 transactions for the purpose of authorization, clearance, or settlement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 247, Sec. 1.   (AB 1587)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

110001.

(a) By July 1, 2024, a payment card network shall make the merchant category code for firearms and ammunition businesses established by the International Organization for Standardization on September 9, 2022, available for merchant acquirers that provide payment services for firearms merchants.

(b) Beginning May 1, 2025, a merchant acquirer shall assign to a firearms merchant the merchant category code for firearms and ammunition businesses established by the International Organization for
 Standardization on September 9, 2022.

(c) A waiver of a provision of this division is contrary to public policy and is void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 247, Sec. 1.   (AB 1587)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

110002.

(a) The Attorney General has exclusive authority to enforce this division.

(b) Not later than the 30th day before bringing an action under subdivision (e), the Attorney General shall give written notice to the person or entity identifying the specific provisions of this chapter that are or were being violated.

(c) The Attorney General shall not bring an action under subdivision (e) if the person or entity who receives the notice described in subdivision (b) does both of the following:

(1) Cures the identified violation within 30 days of receiving the
 notice.

(2) Provides the Attorney General a written statement confirming that the person or entity has done all of the following:

(A) Cured the violation.

(B) Provided supporting documentation to show how the violation was cured.

(C) Made changes to internal policies to prevent the recurrence of violations in the future.

(d) A person or entity who violates this division and fails to cure the violation in accordance with subdivision (c) shall be liable as provided in subdivision (e).

(e) (1) The Attorney General
 may bring a civil action to enforce this division and remedy harm caused by a violation of this division.

(2) If a court determines that a person or entity has violated this division, the court shall award all of the following relief:

(A) A civil penalty in the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation.

(B) Injunctive relief sufficient to prevent the person or entity from further violations of this division.

(C) Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs incurred in investigating and bringing an action under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 45.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

